Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,149.01
Commercial drivers' licenses; law examination; exceptions; department; powers and duties.

(1) A commercial driver's license examiner shall not require the commercial driver's license knowledge examination, except the hazardous material portion of the examination and any knowledge examinations not previously taken for that class of commercial motor vehicle or endorsement, if the applicant renews his or her commercial driver's license prior to its expiration or within one year after its expiration and if the applicant's driving record abstract maintained in the department's computerized records shows that his or her commercial driver's license is not suspended, revoked, canceled, or disqualified.

(2)(a) If a nonresident who applies for a commercial driver's license in this state presents a physical or mobile valid commercial driver's license from another state, the department may choose not to require such individual to take the commercial driver's license knowledge examination.

(b) Subdivision (a) of this subsection shall not apply to the hazardous material portion of the examination and any knowledge examinations not previously taken for that class of commercial motor vehicle or endorsement.

(c) A physical commercial driver's license described in subdivision (a) of this subsection shall be surrendered to the department.

(d) Upon issuing a commercial driver's license described in subdivision (a) of this subsection, the department shall notify the state that issued the valid commercial driver's license described in subdivision (a) of this subsection to invalidate such license.

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 938, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 35;

Laws 2001, LB 387, § 9;

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 13;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 37;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 63.